Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-103
Department of Transportation; rules and regulations; violation; penalty.

Any person who operates a vehicle upon any highway in violation of the rules and regulations of the Department of Transportation governing the use of state highways shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1967, c. 235, § 4, p. 633;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-7,134.01;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-699.01;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 18;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 84.